test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_A_STEM_3.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_A_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_A_STEM_3

     ñíiya+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñíiyaa
     ñíiya+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyaa
     ñíiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyaa
     ñíiya+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyaang
     ñíiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyaayaa
     ñíiya+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíiyaayaan
     ñíiya+V+RELATIVE: ñíiyaas
     ñíiya+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíiyaayaas
     ñíiya+V+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyaa.ang
     ñíiya+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyaayaa.ang
     ñíiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíiyaaäsaa
     ñíiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíiyaaäs
     ñíiya+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíiyaaäsaang
     ñíiya+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíiyaaäsga
     ñíiya+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyaaäsaas
     ñíiya+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyaaäsaa.ang
     ñíiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasa'áa
     ñíiya+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasa'áang
     ñíiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñíiya+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñíiya+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyaa'uuj
     ñíiya+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyaa'uujang
     ñíiya+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíiyaaäsaa'uujang
     ñíiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíiyaa'us
     ñíiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyaa'ujaa
     ñíiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyaa'uujaangaa
     ñíiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyaaäsaa'us
     ñíiya+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíiyaa'ahlanggang
     ñíiya+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíiyaa'ahlanggan
     ñíiya+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyaa'ahlanggiinii
     ñíiya+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíiyaaäsaa'ahlans
     ñíiya+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíiyaa'ahlans
     ñíiya+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíiyaayaa'ahlang
     ñíiya+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíiyaayaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíiya+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíiyaayaa'ahlanggang
     ñíiya+V+REFLEXIVE: ñíiyaa'ahl
     ñíiya+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíiyaaäseehl
     ñíiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñíiya+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñíiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñíiya+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyaa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
